Utah statutes.
77-19-10.   Judgment of death -- Location and procedures for execution.

(1)  The executive director of the Department of Corrections or his designee shall ensure that the method of judgment of death specified in the warrant is carried out at a secure correctional facility operated by the department and at an hour determined by the department on the date specified in the warrant.

(2)  When the judgment of death is to be carried out by lethal intravenous injection, the executive director of the department or his designee shall select two or more persons trained in accordance with accepted medical practices to administer intravenous injections, who shall each administer a continuous intravenous injection, one of which shall be of a lethal quantity of sodium thiopental or other equally or more effective substance sufficient to cause death. 

(3)  If the judgment of death is to be carried out by firing squad under Subsection 77-18-5.5(3) or (4), the executive director of the department or his designee shall select a five-person firing squad of peace officers.

(4)  Compensation for persons administering intravenous injections and for members of a firing squad under Subsection 77-18-5.5(3) or (4) shall be in an amount determined by the director of the Division of Finance.

(5)  Death under this section shall be certified by a physician.

(6)  The department shall adopt and enforce rules governing procedures for the execution of judgments of death.

